Washington statutes.
RCW 8.25.250

Special benefits to remaining property—Attorney fees—Witness fees.

Attorney fees and expert witness fees of the condemnee may be allowed by the attorney general or other attorney representing a condemnor to the extent provided in RCW 8.25.070 and shall be awarded by the court as authorized by this section to the extent provided in RCW 8.25.070 for trial and trial preparation: (1) In the event a trial is held as authorized by RCW 8.25.220 except the judgment awarded to the condemnor must exceed by ten percent or more the highest written offer in settlement of the issue to be determined by trial submitted by the condemnor to those condemnees appearing in the action at least thirty days prior to commencement of the trial; (2) in the event of a trial on the matter of special benefits as authorized by RCW 8.25.230(4) except the judgment awarded to the condemnor must be no more than ninety percent of the lowest written offer in settlement submitted by the condemnor to the condemnees appearing in the action at least thirty days prior to commencement of the trial on the matter of special benefits.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 79 s 5.]